Utah statutes.
63G-6-816 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Effect of prior determination by agents of state.

In any judicial action under Section 63G-6-815, determinations by employees, agents, or other persons appointed by the state shall be final and conclusive only as provided in Sections 63G-6-419, 63G-6-806, and 63G-6-813.

